Utah statutes.
15-1-3.   Calculated by the year.

Whenever in any statute or deed, or written or verbal contract, or in any public or private instrument whatever, any certain rate of interest is mentioned and no period of time is stated, interest shall be calculated at the rate mentioned by the year.



No Change Since 1953

